Utah statutes.
23-21-7.   Unlawful uses and activities on division lands.
(1)  Except as authorized by statute, rule, contractual agreement, special use
permit, certificate of registration, or public notice, a person may not on
division land:
(a)  remove, extract, use, consume, or destroy any improvement or cultural or
historic resource;
(b)  remove, extract, use, consume, or destroy any sand, gravel, cinder,
ornamental rock, or other common mineral resource, or vegetation resource,
except a person may collect for noncommercial uses up to 250 pounds per
calendar year of common rock or gravel lying on the surface of the ground;
(c)  allow livestock to graze;
(d)  remove any plant or portion of a plant for commercial gain purposes;
(e)  enter, use, or occupy division land that is posted against entry, use, or
occupancy;
(f)  enter, use, or occupy division land as part of a group of more than 25
people, except a group may include up to 50 persons if the group consists of
extended family members;
(g)  enter, use, or occupy division land while engaged in or part of an
organized event;
(h)  use, occupy, destroy, move, or construct any structure, including fences,
water control devices, roads, survey and section markers, or signs;
(i)  prohibit, prevent, or obstruct public entry on division lands when public
entry is authorized by the division;
(j)  attempt to manage or control division lands in a manner inconsistent with
division management plans, rules, or policies;
(k)  solicit, promote, negotiate, barter, sell, or trade any product or
service on, or obtained from, division lands for commercial gain;
(l)  park a motor vehicle or trailer or camp for more than 14 consecutive days
unless the area is posted for a different duration;
(m)  light a fire without taking adequate precaution to prevent spreading of
the fire or leave a fire unattended;
(n)  use fireworks, explosives, poisons, herbicides, insecticides, or
pesticides;
(o)  use motorized vehicles of any kind except as authorized by declaration,
management plan, or posting; or
(p)  use division lands for any purpose that violates applicable land use
restrictions imposed by statute, rule, or by the division.
(2)  A person or entity which unlawfully uses division lands is liable for
damages in the amount of:
(a)  the value of the resource removed, destroyed, or extracted;
(b)  the amount of damage caused; and
(c)  whichever is greater of:
(i)  the value of any losses or expenses caused as a result of interference
with authorized activities; or
(ii)  the consideration which would have been charged by the division for use
of the land during the period of trespass.
(3)  This section does not apply to division employees or division volunteers
while acting in the lawful performance of their duties.
(4)  Except as otherwise provided by statute, the criminal penalty for a
violation of any provision of this section is prescribed in Section 23-13-11.
